Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2277XC (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.33, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by adding the following 2 new subparagraph divisions: 3 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (0f) Notwithstanding 4 subparagraph division (c), where income is derived by an 5 airline from transportation operations, the part attributable 6 to business within the state shall be in the proportion that 7 the miles of the airline traveled in this state bears to the 8 total miles of such airline traveled everywhere. 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (00f) (i) Notwithstanding 10 subparagraph division (c), where income is derived by a 11 qualified air freight forwarder from transportation operations 12 through an affiliated airline, such income shall be apportioned 13 as follows: 14 (A) For tax years beginning during the 2025 calendar year, 15 ninety percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned 16 as provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 17 ten percent of such income, the part attributable to business 18 within the state shall be in the proportion that the miles 19 of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated airline 20 traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 21 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 22 (B) For tax years beginning during the 2026 calendar year, 23 eighty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned 24 as provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 25 twenty percent of such income, the part attributable to 26 business within the state shall be in the proportion that the 27 miles of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated 28 airline traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 29 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 30 (C) For tax years beginning during the 2027 calendar year, 31 seventy percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned 32 as provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 33 thirty percent of such income, the part attributable to 34 business within the state shall be in the proportion that the 35 -1- LSB 2277XC (1) 91 jm/jh 1/ 5 S.F. _____ miles of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated 1 airline traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 2 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 3 (D) For tax years beginning during the 2028 calendar year, 4 sixty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned as 5 provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 6 forty percent of such income, the part attributable to business 7 within the state shall be in the proportion that the miles 8 of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated airline 9 traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 10 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 11 (E) For tax years beginning during the 2029 calendar year, 12 fifty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned as 13 provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 14 fifty percent of such income, the part attributable to business 15 within the state shall be in the proportion that the miles 16 of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated airline 17 traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 18 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 19 (F) For tax years beginning during the 2030 calendar year, 20 forty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned as 21 provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 22 sixty percent of such income, the part attributable to business 23 within the state shall be in the proportion that the miles 24 of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated airline 25 traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 26 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 27 (G) For tax years beginning during the 2031 calendar year, 28 thirty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned 29 as provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 30 seventy percent of such income, the part attributable to 31 business within the state shall be in the proportion that the 32 miles of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated 33 airline traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 34 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 35 -2- LSB 2277XC (1) 91 jm/jh 2/ 5 S.F. _____ (H) For tax years beginning during the 2032 calendar year, 1 twenty percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned 2 as provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 3 eighty percent of such income, the part attributable to 4 business within the state shall be in the proportion that the 5 miles of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated 6 airline traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 7 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 8 (I) For tax years beginning during the 2033 calendar year, 9 ten percent of such income shall be equitably apportioned as 10 provided in subparagraph division (c), and of the remaining 11 ninety percent of such income, the part attributable to 12 business within the state shall be in the proportion that the 13 miles of the qualified air freight forwarderâs affiliated 14 airline traveled in this state bears to the total miles of the 15 affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 16 (J) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2034, 17 the part attributable to business within the state shall be 18 in the proportion that the miles of the qualified air freight 19 forwarderâs affiliated airline traveled in this state bears to 20 the total miles of the affiliated airline traveled everywhere. 21 (ii) For purposes of this subparagraph division (00f), 22 âqualified air freight forwarderâ means a taxpayer who meets all 23 of the following requirements: 24 (A) The taxpayer is primarily engaged in the facilitation of 25 the transportation of property by air. 26 (B) The taxpayer does not itself operate aircraft. 27 (C) The taxpayer is in the same affiliated group as an 28 airline. 29 Sec. 2. Section 422.33, subsection 2, paragraph a, 30 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (g), Code 2025, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 (g) Where income consists of more than one class of income 33 as provided in subparagraph divisions (a) through (e) (00f) 34 of this subparagraph, it shall be reasonably apportioned by 35 -3- LSB 2277XC (1) 91 jm/jh 3/ 5 S.F. _____ the business activity ratio provided in rules adopted by the 1 director. 2 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 3 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 4 or after that date. 5